src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/V-1Y-siylggyd_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup




Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - siâlggâd: # Verb '/selvitä' - full paradigm
     siâlggâd+V+Inf: siâlggâd
     siâlggâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: siâlǥam
     siâlggâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: siâlǥak
     siâlggâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: seälgg
     siâlggâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: siâlggâp
     siâlggâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: siâlggveʹted
     siâlggâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: seäʹlǧǧe
     siâlggâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: siâlǥât
     siâlggâd+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: siâlǥ
     siâlggâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sieʹlǧǧem
     siâlggâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: sieʹlǧǧiǩ
     siâlggâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: siâlǥi
     siâlggâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: siâlǥim
     siâlggâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: siâlǥid
     siâlggâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: sieʹlǧǧe
     siâlggâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: sieʹlǧǧeš
     siâlggâd+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: siâlggâm
     siâlggâd+V+Pot+Sg1: siâlǥžem
     siâlggâd+V+Pot+Sg2: siâlǥžiǩ
     siâlggâd+V+Pot+Sg3: siâlǥâž
     siâlggâd+V+Pot+Pl1: siâlǥžep
     siâlggâd+V+Pot+Pl2: siâlǥžid
     siâlggâd+V+Pot+Pl3: siâlǥže
     siâlggâd+V+Pot+Sg4: siâlǥžet
     siâlggâd+V+Pot+ConNeg: siâlǥže
     siâlggâd+V+Cond+Sg1: siâlǥčem
     siâlggâd+V+Cond+Sg2: siâlǥčiǩ
     siâlggâd+V+Cond+Sg3: siâlǥči
     siâlggâd+V+Cond+Pl1: siâlǥčim
     siâlggâd+V+Cond+Pl2: siâlǥčid
     siâlggâd+V+Cond+Pl3: siâlǥče
     siâlggâd+V+Cond+Sg4: siâlǥčeš
     siâlggâd+V+Cond+ConNeg: siâlǥče
     siâlggâd+V+Imprt+Sg2: siâlǥ
     siâlggâd+V+Imprt+Sg3: siâlǥas
     siâlggâd+V+Imprt+Pl1: siâlggâp
     siâlggâd+V+Imprt+Pl2: siâlggâd
     siâlggâd+V+Imprt+Pl3: seälggaz
     siâlggâd+V+Imprt+ConNeg: siâlǥ
     siâlggâd+V+Imprt+ConNegII: siâlggu
     siâlggâd+V+Actio+Ess: siâlggmen
     siâlggâd+V+Actio: siâlggâm
     siâlggâd+V+Act+PrsPrc: siâlggi
     siâlggâd+V+Act+PrfPrc: siâlggâm
     siâlggâd+V+Pass+PrfPrc: siâlggum
     siâlggâd+V+VAbess: siâlǥǩâni
     siâlggâd+V+Ger+Ess: siâlǥeen
     siâlggâd+V+Ger+Instr: siâlǥeeʹl
     siâlggâd+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: siâˈlǥškuẹʹtted
